District of Columbia statutes.
47-2853.16

Display of license, certificate, or registration; notice of changes of address.

(a)

Each person licensed, certified, or registered under this subchapter shall conspicuously display or maintain on file the license, certificate, or registration in all places of covered non-health related business or places of employment.

(b)

Each person licensed, certified, or registered under this subchapter shall notify the Mayor of any change of address of the place of residence or place of business or employment within 30 days after the change of address.

(c)

Each person licensed, certified, or registered under this subchapter shall be subject to the penalties provided by this subchapter for failure to comply with the requirements of this section.

Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1002, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 47-2853.16.